dictsource/gu_rules
// Gujarati Language.
// This gu_rules file is prepared by Maheshinder Singh Khosla< mahesh.khosla@gmail.com >.

// This file is UTF8 encoded

// letter groups:
// A   vowel letters and vowel signs
// B   vowel signs and virama ्
// C   consonants
// Y   vowel letters and vowel signs

// Schwa kept or dropped: corrections learned from WikiPron on top of the
// phoneme table's own schwa deletion.
// The rule lines marked "// generated" in each consonant group are not
// hand-written: android/tools/schwa learns them (rule induction on 80% of
// the words) and writes them here.
// L20 = written vowels (signs, and independent vowels except અ);
// L21 = consonant letters; L22 = any Gujarati letter; L23 = ં ઁ.
.L20 ા િ ી ુ ૂ ૃ ૄ ૅ ૆ ે ૈ ૉ ૊ ો ૌ આ ઇ ઈ ઉ ઊ ઋ ઌ ઍ ઎ એ ઐ ઑ ઒ ઓ ઔ ૢ ૣ ૠ ૡ ૅ ૉ ઍ ઑ
.L21 ક ખ ગ ઘ ઙ ચ છ જ ઝ ઞ ટ ઠ ડ ઢ ણ ત થ દ ધ ન ઩ પ ફ બ ભ મ ય ર ઱ લ ળ ઴ વ શ ષ સ હ
.L22 અ આ ઇ ઈ ઉ ઊ ઋ ઌ ઍ ઎ એ ઐ ઑ ઒ ઓ ઔ ક ખ ગ ઘ ઙ ચ છ જ ઝ ઞ ટ ઠ ડ ઢ ણ ત થ દ ધ ન ઩ પ ફ બ ભ મ ય ર ઱ લ ળ ઴ વ શ ષ સ હ ા િ ી ુ ૂ ૃ ૄ ૅ ૆ ે ૈ ૉ ૊ ો ૌ ં ઁ ઃ ૢ ૣ ૠ ૡ ૅ ૉ ઍ ઑ
.L23 ં ઁ

.replace
 ૦	0
 ૧	1
 ૨	2
 ૩	3
 ૪	4
 ૫	5
 ૬	6
 ૭	7
 ૮	8
 ૯	9

// combine dot consonants into a single character
ક઼	ક઼
ખ઼	ખ઼
ગ઼	ગ઼
જ઼	જ઼
ડ઼	ડ઼
ઢ઼	ઢ઼
ફ઼	ફ઼
ય઼	ય઼	

// Vowels


.group અ
        અ          V
        અ (હ       E         //  (h
    અહ) અ          E

.group આ
        આ          a:
        આં          a~        // + anusvara; was V~ (nasalized schwa - wrong
                               // vowel quality, not just wrong length) -
                               // hi_rules/mr_rules both nasalize the same a:
                               // vowel here (a~), not switch to a different
                               // one; found by cross-checking Gujarati's
                               // handling against its sibling languages

.group ઇ
        ઇ          I
        ઇ (_       ,i:      // final short i lengthens in Gujarati; secondary
                             // stress (not primary) needed so ph_hindi_base's
                             // i: phoneme doesn't self-demote back to plain i
                             // when this syllable isn't the word's own
                             // stressed one - see hi_rules for the same fix
//       ઇઁ        I~
       ઇં        I~        // was "In" (vowel + separate n consonant) -
                            // this group's own િં (_ rule already correctly
                            // used I~; matches hi_rules' nasalized-vowel
                            // convention throughout

.group ઈ
        ઈ          i:
        ઈ (_       ,i:      // final -i is always long; was plain "i"
                             // (word-final SHORTENING, backwards) before this
                             // - see .group ઇ above for why the stress mark
                             // matters

.group ઉ
        ઉ          U
        ઉ (_       u:       // final short u lengthens; no stress mark needed
                             // here - u: has no self-demotion guard

.group ઊ
        ઊ          u
        ઊં         u~        // + anusvara; was "un" (vowel + a separate n
                              // consonant) - hi_rules nasalizes the same u
                              // vowel instead (u~), a single nasalized-vowel
                              // phoneme rather than an added consonant
        ઊઁ (_       u~        // + candrabindu

.group ઋ
        ઋ          ru

.group ઌ
        ઌ          l-        // vocalic l

.group ઍ
        ઍ          E         // candra e

.group એ
        એ          e:
        એઁ          e~:
        એં          e~:
    ા) એઁ (_       j

.group ઐ
        ઐ          aI        // ?? [aI] [E:] [&:]
        ઐં          aI~
        ઐઁ (_       aI~

	

.group ઑ
        ઑ          O         // candra O

.group ઓ
        ઓ          o:
        ઓં         o~        // +anusvara; was "on" (vowel + separate n
                              // consonant) - see .group ઊ above for why
        ઓઁ (_       o~        // +candrabindu
    ા) ઓં (_       w        // +anusvara
    ા) ઓઁ (_       w
 
.group ઔ
        ઔ          aU        // ?? [aU] [O:]
        ઔં          aU~       // +anusvara
        ઔઁ (_       aU~        // +candrabindu



// Vowel Signs

.group ા
ા	#X2a:
C)        ા          a:
C)        ા (ઁ       V~
C)        ાઁ (_      V~
C)        ાં         V~

.group િ
િ	#X1I
C)        િ          I
C)        િ (_       ,i:      // final short i lengthens; see .group ઇ above
C)//      િઁ       I~
C)      િં        I~        // was "In"; see .group ઇ above
C)      િં (_     I~

.group ી
ી	#X2i:
C)        ી          i:
C)        ી (_       ,i:      // final -i is always long; see .group ઇ above
C)        ી (ઁ       i~        // was "in"; see .group ઇ above
C)        ીઁ (_      i~
C)        ીં         i~
C)        ીં (_      i~

.group ુ
ુ	#X1U
C)        ુ          u
C)        ુ (_       u:       // final short u lengthens; see .group ઉ above
C)        ુ (ઁ       u~        // was "un"; see .group ઇ above
C)        ુઁ (_      u~
C)        ું         u~
C)        ું (_      u~

.group ૂ
ૂ	#X2u:
C)        ૂ          u:
C)        ૂ (ઁ       u~        // was "un" (vowel + separate n consonant) -
                              // hi_rules' ू group uses u~ consistently for
                              // every candrabindu/anusvara variant; this one
                              // and the two below it were the odd ones out
                              // (ૂં (_ already correctly used u~)
C)        ૂઁ (_      u~
C)        ૂં         u~
C)        ૂં (_      u~        // or O~   ??

.group ૃ
ૃ	#X1ru
C)        ૃ          ru

.group ૄ
ૄ	#X1ru
C)        ૄ          ru

.group ૅ
ૅ	#X1E
C)        ૅ          E

.group ે
ે	#X2e:
C)        ે          e:
C)        ે (ઁ       e~
C)        ેં         e~:
C)        ેઁ (_      e~:

.group ૈ
ૈ	#X2aI
C)        ૈ           aI        // ?? [aI] [E:] [&:]
C)        ૈં         aI~
C)        ૈ (ઁ       aI~ 
C)        ૈઁ (_      aI~


.group ૉ
ૉ	#X1O
C)        ૉ          O

.group ો
ો	#X2o:
C)        ો          o:
C)        ોં         o~        // was "on"; see .group ઇ above
C)        ોં (_      o~
C)        ો (ઁ       o~
C)        ોઁ (_      o~

.group ૌ
ૌ	#X2aU
C)        ૌ          aU        //  [O:] or [aU] ??
C)        ૌ (ઁ       aU~        //  [O:] or [aU] ??
C)        ૌં         aU~
C)        ૌઁ (_      aU~


.group ૢ     // vowel sign l
ૢ 	#X1l-
C)        ૢ          l-

.group ૣ    // vowel sign ll
ૣ	#X2l-:
C)        ૣ          l-:

.group ૐ
        ૐ          o~m

// Consonants

.group ક
        ક          kV
        _L22) ક (L21L21_         k@       // generated
        _L22L22) ક (L21L21_      k@       // generated
        L22) ક (L21L21_          k@       // generated
        _L22) ક (L21L23_         k        // generated
        _L22) ક (L21L23          k        // generated
        _L22L22) ક (L21L23_      k        // generated
        _L22L22) ક (L21L23       k        // generated
        L22) ક (L21L23_          k        // generated
        L22) ક (L21L23           k        // generated
        _L22) ક (L21્_           k@       // generated
        _L22) ક (L21્            k@       // generated
        _L22L22) ક (L21્_        k@       // generated
        _L22L22) ક (L21્         k@       // generated
        L22) ક (L21્_            k@       // generated
        L22) ક (L21્             k@       // generated
        _L20L22) ક (L21_         k@       // generated
        _L20L22) ક (L21L22_      k@       // generated
        L20L22) ક (L21_          k@       // generated
        L20L22) ક (L21L22_       k@       // generated
        _L21L23) ક (L21L20_      k        // generated
        _L21L23) ક (L21L20       k        // generated
        L21L23) ક (L21L20_       k        // generated
        L21L23) ક (L21L20        k        // generated
        _L22) ક (L21ર_           k        // generated
        _L22) ક (L21ર            k        // generated
        _L22L22) ક (L21ર_        k        // generated
        _L22L22) ક (L21ર         k        // generated
        _L20) ક (પL22_           k        // generated
        _L20) ક (પL22            k        // generated
        _L22L20) ક (પL22_        k        // generated
        _L22L20) ક (પL22         k        // generated
        L20) ક (પL22_            k        // generated
        L20) ક (પL22             k        // generated
        _L22) ક (હL22_           k        // generated
        _L22) ક (હL22            k        // generated
        _L22L22) ક (હL22_        k        // generated
        _L22L22) ક (હL22         k        // generated
        L22) ક (હL22_            k        // generated
        L22) ક (હL22             k        // generated
        _ેL22) ક (L21_           k@       // generated
        _ેL22) ક (L21L22_        k@       // generated
        _ેL22) ક (L21            k@       // generated
        ેL22) ક (L21_            k@       // generated
        ેL22) ક (L21L22_         k@       // generated
        ેL22) ક (L21             k@       // generated
        રL22L22) ક (L21L20_      k@       // generated
        રL22L22) ક (L21L20       k@       // generated
        _L22) ક (L21ન_           k        // generated
        _L22L22) ક (L21ન_        k        // generated
        કઁ         kV~        // + candrabindu
        ક (_       k
        ક (B       k
        ક (્ય      k:
        ક઼         qV
        ક઼ઁ        qV~        // + candrabindu
        ક઼ (_      q
        ક઼ (B      q
